Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2,109
Joint tenancy; no severance of real estate; exception.

There shall be no severance of an existing joint tenancy in real estate when all joint tenants execute any instrument with respect to the property held in joint tenancy, unless the intention to effect a severance expressly appears in the instrument.

Laws 1979, LB 73, § 1.